Colorado, session 2026A, HB1352.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-7-1209, amend
(8)(a) and (8)(e) as follows:
22-7-1209. State board - rules - department - duties -
independent evaluations.
(8) (a) (I) By October 1, 2019, The department shall issue a request
for proposals to contract with an entity to act as an independent evaluator
to provide independent evaluations of the use of per-pupil intervention
money and money received through the early literacy grant program by local
education providers and to conduct a multi-year evaluation to determine
whether the student outcomes achieved by local education providers in
implementing this part 12 meet the goals of this part 12 as described in
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

section 22-7-1202 (2) and (3)(a). BEGINNING IN THE 2026-27 SCHOOL YEAR,
THE INDEPENDENT EVALUATIONS MUST OCCUR BIENNIALLY.
(II) LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDERS SHALL CONTINUE TO ANNUALLY
SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT THE INFORMATION REQUIRED BY SECTION
22-7-1208 (8)(a).
(III) IN ADDITION TO POSTING THE INFORMATION AS REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (9) OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ANNUALLY POST
A REPORT ON ITS WEBSITE THAT SUMMARIZES THE DATA FROM THE LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDERS AND INCLUDES ANY DEPARTMENT INPUT ON
PROPOSED PROGRAM CHANGES.
(e) The independent evaluator contracted pursuant to this subsection
(8) shall complete the evaluation of the implementation of this part 12 as
described in subsection (8)(c) of this section by July 1, 2021. The
department shall include a report of the evaluation in the hearing before the
joint education committee held pursuant to section 2-7-203 in November or
December 2021. BEGINNING IN THE 2026-27 SCHOOL YEAR, AND
BIENNIALLY THEREAFTER, the independent evaluator shall continue
evaluations of EVALUATE the growth in reading achieved by local education
providers' use of per-pupil intervention money and money received through
the early literacy grant program.
SECTION 2. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to implement this
act, the cash funds appropriation from the state education fund created in
section 17 (4)(a) of article IX of the state constitution made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of education for use by student learning for the early literacy program
external evaluation is decreased by $750,000.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the cash fund appropriation from the state
education fund made in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27
state fiscal year to the department of education for use by student learning
for the early literacy program external evaluation is less than the amount of
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1352

the adjustment required in subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation from the state education fund to the
department of education for use by student learning for the early literacy
program external evaluation.
SECTION 3. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that section 2 of this act takes effect only if the annual general
appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year becomes law, in which
case section 2 takes effect upon the effective date of this act or of the annual
general appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1352

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1352